Arkansas, session 2025, HB1629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-21-147(b), concerning the powers of a
prosecuting attorney and a deputy prosecuting attorney, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(5) When a prosecuting attorney or a deputy prosecuting attorney
whom a prosecuting attorney has authorized to carry a firearm retires from
service as a prosecuting attorney or deputy prosecuting attorney, in
recognition of and appreciation for his or her service to the state may be
awarded any firearm carried during his or her tenure as prosecuting attorney
or deputy prosecuting attorney.







*CEB174*
02/27/2025 4:36:09 PM CEB174